Tennessee, session 114, SB2044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of health shall conduct a study on health concerns of, and
identifying obstacles for receiving better care for, persons whose biological sex is female. The
department shall submit a report to the members of the general assembly on the results of the
study on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2044
012126
- 1 -